Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.784

Budget calculation—Participation rate and enrollment level estimates—Recommendations to governor and legislature.

The participation rate used to calculate enrollment levels under RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 shall be based on fall enrollment reported in the higher education enrollment report as maintained by the office of financial management, fall enrollment as reported in the management information system of the state board for community and technical colleges, and the corresponding fall population forecast by the office of financial management. Formal estimates of the state participation rates and enrollment levels necessary to fulfill the requirements of RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 shall be determined by the office of financial management as part of its responsibility to develop and maintain student enrollment forecasts for colleges and universities under RCW 43.62.050. Formal estimates of the state participation rates and enrollment levels required by this section shall be based on procedures and standards established by a technical work group consisting of staff from the student achievement council, the public four-year institutions of higher education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the fiscal and higher education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, and the office of financial management. Formal estimates of the state participation rates and enrollment levels required by this section shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate on or before November 15th of each even-numbered year. The student achievement council shall periodically review the enrollment goals set forth in RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 and submit recommendations concerning modification of these goals to the governor and to the higher education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

[ 2012 c 229 s 517; 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 28B.10.776.